New York, session 2025-2026, A3983.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "freedom to 2 rally and engage equitably (FREE) act". 3 § 2. Paragraph a of subdivision 1 of section 201-d of the labor law, 4 as added by chapter 776 of the laws of 1992, is amended and a new para- 5 graph f is added to read as follows: 6 a. "Political activities" shall mean (i) running for public office, 7 (ii) campaigning for a candidate for public office, [or] (iii) partic- 8 ipating in fund-raising activities for the benefit of a candidate, poli- 9 tical party or political advocacy group, or (iv) actions involving 10 public petition and participation; 11 f. "Action involving public petition and participation" shall mean (i) 12 any communication in a place open to the public or a public forum in 13 connection with an issue of public interest; or (ii) any other lawful 14 conduct in furtherance of the exercise of the constitutional right of 15 free speech in connection with an issue of public interest, or in furth- 16 erance of the exercise of the constitutional right of petition. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07338-01-5